Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 36 Railroads and Carriers

11-36-1.
Hindering passage of trains — Placing explosives near highways, buildings, or tracks.

Every person who shall willfully place upon any railroad track any substance or thing with intent to hinder or impede the passage of any locomotive engine or car over the railroad, or shall willfully do any other act, matter, or thing, with intent to hinder, impede, or interrupt the passage of the locomotive engine or car, or whoever willfully throws into, against, or upon, or puts, places, or explodes, or causes to be exploded, in, upon or near a public highway, building, monument, bridge, railroad track, or car on it, or vessel, any gunpowder or other explosive substance, or a bombshell, torpedo, or any instrument or package filled or loaded with an explosive substance, with intent unlawfully to destroy or injure the highway, building, monument, bridge, railroad track, car, or vessel, or any person or property, in, on or near the highway, building, monument, highway, bridge, railroad track, car, or vessel, shall be imprisoned not less than two (2) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or be fined not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 30; P.L. 1909, ch. 429, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-1

; P.L. 1987, ch. 76, § 1.

11-36-2.
Unauthorized stopping of train.

Whoever willfully or maliciously stops, or causes to be stopped, a train on a railroad for the purpose of entering, leaving, or wantonly delaying it shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-2

.

11-36-3.
Throwing missiles at train.

Whoever willfully throws or shoots a missile at a locomotive engine, railroad, or street railway car, or other means of public conveyance, or at a person on the engine or car or conveyance, or in any way assaults or interferes with a conductor, engineer, brake operator, driver, or motor operator while in discharge of his or her duty on or near a railroad engine, car, or train, or on or near a street railway car or other means of public conveyance, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not more than one year. Any violation of the provisions of this section which results in a personal injury to an employee or passenger shall be considered a felony, punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the state prison not exceeding three (3) years, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 154, § 1.

11-36-4.
Injuring railroad signals or signal lines.

Whoever unlawfully and intentionally injures, molests, or destroys any electric or other signal of a railroad corporation, or any line, wire, post, or other structure or mechanism used in connection with a signal on a railroad, or destroys, or in any way interferes with, the proper working of the signal, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-4

.

11-36-5.
Loitering on railroad or bus line property.

Every person who shall loiter or remain about or in any station house of any railroad corporation or the station house or terminal of any bus line or bus company or upon the platforms, tracks, or grounds of any company or corporation, adjoining any station or terminal, after being requested to leave by any officer or agent of the company operating or using the facilities, shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-5

; P.L. 1968, ch. 22, § 1.

11-36-6.
Trespassing on railroad right-of-way.

Every person who without right knowingly stands or walks, or rides a bicycle or other vehicle on the private right-of-way of any railroad or railway operated by steam or other power, except for the purpose of crossing it at a highway or other authorized crossing, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both. Any person violating this section may be arrested without a warrant by any police officer or any special railroad police officer and proceeded against according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 613, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 35; P.L. 1913, ch. 953, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-6

; P.L. 1985, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 76, § 1.

11-36-7.
Posting of statute.

A printed copy of §

11-36-6

shall be conspicuously posted in a public place in or upon each passenger station of every railroad and railway operated by steam or other power in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 613, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 36; P.L. 1913, ch. 953, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-7

.

11-36-8.
Removal of waste or packing from journal boxes.

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously take or remove the waste or packing from out of any journal box or boxes of any locomotive, engine, tender, carriage, coach, car, caboose, or truck used or operated upon any railroad, whether operated by steam or electricity, shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than three (3) years or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1217, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-8

.

11-36-9.
Obstruction of street railway company.

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously obstruct a street railway company in the use of its tracks, or willfully and maliciously delay or obstruct the passing of its cars or carriages, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000) or by imprisonment not exceeding two (2) years; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with the necessary work of laying and repairing any gas or water pipes or sewers, or the necessary and reasonable obstruction of tracks by vehicles in the process of loading and unloading not prohibited by any town or city ordinance. Every person who shall aid, assist, abet, counsel, hire, command, or procure any person to do or attempt any of the acts mentioned in this section shall be subject to fine or imprisonment pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, §§ 65, 66; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, §§ 68, 69; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, §§ 68, 69; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, §§ 75, 76; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-9

.

11-36-10.
Evasion of payment of fare.

Every person who shall fraudulently evade or attempt to evade the payment of any fare, rate or toll lawfully established by any railroad company, or a street railway company, or a toll bridge company, or by the owners or charterers of any steamboat or ferryboat, or by any steamship company, or by any owner or operator of a motor bus holding a certificate from the public utility commission, or by the Rhode Island public transit authority, either by giving a false answer to the collector of the fare, rate, or toll, or by presenting for his or her fare, rate, or toll a ticket good only for the transportation of another person, or by traveling beyond the point to which he or she may have paid his or her fare, rate, or toll, or by leaving the train, car, bridge, steamboat, ferryboat, or steamship without having paid the fair, rate, or toll established for the distance traveled, or otherwise, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 46; P.L. 1916, ch. 1391, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 46; P.L. 1930, ch. 1534, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 151, § 1.

11-36-11.
Unauthorized presence on locomotive or freight train.

Every person who shall without right attach himself or herself to or shall be in or upon any locomotive, locomotive tender, freight car, or freight train upon any railroad track shall be fined not more than twenty dollars ($20.00), or be imprisoned not more than ten (10) days, or both. Any person violating this section may be arrested without a warrant by any police officer, or any railroad police officer, and proceeded against according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1909, ch. 373, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 73; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 81; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-11

.

11-36-12.
Profiteering on tickets.

No person shall resell or offer for resale a ticket or tickets for passage of a person on a common carrier at an increase in price in excess of one dollar ($1.00) over the established rate for the passage and, whenever the resale is completed, the seller shall give to the purchaser a receipt indicating the amount paid for the ticket or tickets. Any person found guilty of violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 59; P.L. 1944, ch. 1415, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-36-12

.

11-36-13.
Tampering with railroad switches.

Whoever unlawfully removes, turns, destroys, or tampers with any railroad switch or in any way interferes with the proper working of a switch shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding three (3) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 76, § 1.

11-36-14.
“Railroad corporation” and “company” defined.

“Railroad corporation” and “railroad company,” wherever used in this chapter, include in their meaning the National Railroad Foundation and Museum.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 60, § 1.